Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5929YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2076 Section 1. Section 476.49, subsection 3, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) Any excess kilowatt-hours remaining at the end of a 3 twelve-month period shall be cashed out at the request of 4 a customer or when a customer discontinues service with an 5 electric utility at the electric utilityâs avoided cost rate 6 with the funds from the cash out divided evenly between the 7 customer and the electric utilityâs low-income home energy 8 assistance program. The distributed generation customer 9 shall choose either a January or April cash out date at the 10 time of interconnection being sent directly to the customer . 11 Kilowatt-hour credits shall remain in a customerâs account to 12 offset kilowatt-hours in future billing until a cash out is 13 requested by the customer or the customer discontinues service 14 with the electric utility. 15